Nebraska, session 109, LB645.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 79-916, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-916 (1)(a) On July 1, 2004, the board shall transfer from the School
Retirement Fund to the Service Annuity Fund an amount equal to the funded ratio
of the retirement system which is equal to the market value of the retirement
system assets divided by the actuarial accrued liability of the retirement
system, times the actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity, as
determined pursuant to section 79-966.01, of the employees who are members of
the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act. Beginning July 1, 2013, such actuarial accrued liability shall
be determined for each employee on a level percentage of salary basis. On or
before July 1 of each fiscal year, the state shall transfer into the Service
Annuity Fund such amounts as may be necessary to pay the normal cost and
amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity, as
determined pursuant to section 79-966.01, as of the end of the previous fiscal
year of the employees who are members of the retirement system established
pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Based on the fiscal
year of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School
Employees Retirement Act, the administrator of such system shall provide all
membership information needed for the actuary engaged by the retirement board
to determine the normal cost and the amortization payment of the unfunded
actuarial accrued liability, as determined pursuant to section 79-966.01, to be
paid by the state to the Service Annuity Fund each fiscal year as required by
this subdivision.
(b) At the time of retirement of any employee who is a member of the
retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act and who was hired prior to July 1, 2016, the retirement board
shall, upon receipt of a certification of the administrator of such retirement
system of the name, identification number, date of birth, retirement date, last
date of employment, type of retirement, and number of years of service credited
to such eligible employee at the date of retirement, transfer from the Service
Annuity Fund to the Class V school district for transfer to the retirement
system the actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity to be paid to the
Class V school district by the state for transfer to the eligible employee for
the years of service thus certified as provided for members of the School
Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska under sections 79-933 and
79-952. Such transfer of the actuarial accrued liability to the Class V school
district for transfer to the retirement system established pursuant to the
Class V School Employees Retirement Act shall be in lieu of the payment of the
service annuity to which the employee would be entitled.
(c) The Service Annuity Fund is created. The fund shall consist of the
amounts paid by the state and transferred from the School Retirement Fund to
the Class V school district for transfer to the retirement system pursuant to
this section to pay the service annuity to the Class V school district for
transfer to employees who are members of the retirement system established
pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act. Any money in the
Service Annuity Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2)(a) For each fiscal year prior to July 1, 2025, in (2) In addition to
the transfer of the actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section, the state shall also transfer to the funds
of the Class V school district for transfer to the district's retirement system
an amount determined by multiplying the compensation of all members of such
retirement system by the percent specified in subsection (2) of section 79-966
for determining the amount of the state's payment to the School Retirement Fund
plus the amount determined under subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966. The
transfer shall be made annually on or before July 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) For each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in addition to the
transfer pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the state shall also
transfer to the funds of the Class V school district for transfer to the
district's retirement system an amount equal to two percent of the compensation
of all members of such retirement system plus the amount determined under
-1-

LB645 LB645
2025 2025
subdivision (1)(b) of section 79-966. The transfer shall be made annually on or
before July 1 of each fiscal year.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state transfer of two
percent of the compensation of all members of the district's retirement system
does not mean that the state assumes any additional financial responsibility or
liability for funding obligations of the retirement system that remain the
responsibility of the district as described in the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act.
Sec. 2. Section 79-958, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-958 (1)(a) (1) Beginning on September 1, 2012, and prior to July 1,
2025, for the purpose of providing the funds to pay for formula annuities,
every employee shall be required to deposit in the School Retirement Fund nine
and seventy-eight hundredths of one percent of compensation. Such deposits
shall be transmitted at the same time and in the same manner as required
employer contributions.
(b) Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter, the employee contribution
rate shall be calculated as of July 1 and based on the funded ratio of the
actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement Fund in the most recent
previous year as reported in the annual actuarial valuation report for the
retirement system prepared for the retirement board pursuant to section
84-1503. Beginning on July 1, 2025, for the purpose of providing the funds to
pay for formula annuities, every employee shall deposit the following amounts
into the School Retirement Fund:
(i) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is less than ninety-six percent, nine and three-quarters of one
percent of compensation;
(ii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is ninety-six percent or greater and less than ninety-eight
percent, eight and three-quarters of one percent of compensation;
(iii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is ninety-eight percent or greater and less than one hundred
percent, eight percent of compensation; and
(iv) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is one hundred percent or greater, seven and one-quarter of one
percent of compensation.
(c) Deposits under this subsection shall be transmitted at the same time
and in the same manner as required employer contributions.
(2) For the purpose of providing the funds to pay for formula annuities,
every employer shall be required to deposit in the School Retirement Fund one
hundred one percent of the required contributions of the school employees of
each employer. Such deposits shall be transmitted to the retirement board at
the same time and in the same manner as such required employee contributions.
(3) The employer shall pick up the member contributions required by this
section for all compensation paid on or after January 1, 1986, and the
contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions pursuant
to section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code in determining federal tax
treatment under the code and shall not be included as gross income of the
member until such time as they are distributed or made available. The
contributions, although designated as member contributions, shall be paid by
the employer in lieu of member contributions. The employer shall pay these
member contributions from the same source of funds which is used in paying
earnings to the member. The employer shall pick up these contributions by a
compensation deduction through a reduction in the cash compensation of the
member. Member contributions picked up shall be treated for all purposes of the
School Employees Retirement Act in the same manner and to the same extent as
member contributions made prior to the date picked up.
(4) The employer shall pick up the member contributions made through
irrevocable payroll deduction authorizations pursuant to sections 79-921 and
79-933.03 to 79-933.06, and the contributions so picked up shall be treated as
employer contributions in the same manner as contributions picked up under
subsection (3) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 79-966, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
79-966 (1)(a) On the basis of all data in the possession of the retirement
board, including such mortality and other tables as are recommended by the
actuary engaged by the retirement board and adopted by the retirement board,
the retirement board shall annually, on or before July 1, determine the state
deposit to be made by the state in the School Retirement Fund for that fiscal
year. The amount of such state deposit shall be determined pursuant to section
79-966.01. The retirement board shall thereupon certify the amount of such
state deposit, and on the warrant of the Director of Administrative Services,
the State Treasurer shall, as of July 1 of such year, transfer from funds
appropriated by the state for that purpose to the School Retirement Fund the
amount of such state deposit.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2016, the contingent state transfer described in
this subsection shall be calculated as a percent of compensation of all members
of the retirement system. For any year in which a deposit is made to the School
Retirement Fund under this subsection, if the actuary for a retirement system
provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act determines that
the actuarially required contribution rate, for the fiscal year of the
retirement system that begins before the state deposit, exceeds the rate of all
contributions required pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act,
-2-

LB645 LB645
2025 2025
using the amortization period specified in section 79-966.01, the Class V
district school board may request a public hearing of the Appropriations
Committee of the Legislature to ask the state to transfer to the Class V school
district for transfer to the funds of the retirement system provided for under
the Class V School Employees Retirement Act an amount determined by multiplying
the compensation of all members of such retirement system by the lesser of the
percent of compensation transferred into the School Retirement Fund under this
subsection or the percent of compensation of the members of the retirement
system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act needed to
meet the actuarially required contribution rate for such system, using the
amortization period specified in section 79-966.01. Any additional amount of
transfer so calculated, recommended by the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and approved by the Legislature, shall be added to the two percent
specified in subsection (2) of this section for the amount required by
subsection (2) of section 79-916 to be transferred to the Class V school
district, which shall transfer such amount to the funds of the retirement
system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.
(2)(a) (2) For each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2014, and prior to July
1, 2025, in addition to the state transfers required by subsections (1) and (3)
of this section, the state shall transfer into the School Retirement Fund an
amount equal to two percent of the compensation of all members of the
retirement system.
(b) Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter, the state contribution
rate under this subsection shall be calculated as of July 1 and based on the
funded ratio of the actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement Fund in
the most recent previous year as reported in the annual actuarial valuation
report for the retirement system produced for the retirement board pursuant to
section 84-1503. In addition to the state transfers required by subsections (1)
and (3) of this section, the state shall deposit the following amounts into the
School Retirement Fund:
(i) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is less than ninety-six percent, an amount equal to two percent
of the compensation of all members of the retirement system;
(ii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is ninety-six percent or greater and less than one hundred
percent, an amount equal to seven-tenths of one percent of the compensation of
all members of the retirement system; and
(iii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School
Retirement Fund is one hundred percent or greater, no transfer shall be made
under this subsection.
(3) In addition to the state deposits and transfers required by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, beginning on July 1, 2005, and each
fiscal year thereafter for employees who become members prior to July 1, 2016,
the state shall transfer into the Service Annuity Fund such amounts as may be
necessary to pay the normal cost and amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued
liability of the service annuity benefit established pursuant to sections
79-933 and 79-952 as accrued through the end of the previous fiscal year of the
school employees who are members of the retirement system established pursuant
to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.
Sec. 4. Section 81-2026, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
81-2026 (1)(a) Any officer qualified for an annuity as provided in section
81-2025 for reasons other than disability shall be entitled to receive a
monthly annuity for the remainder of the officer's life. The annuity payments
shall continue until the end of the calendar month in which the officer dies.
The amount of the annuity shall be a percentage of the officer's final average
monthly compensation. For retirement on or after the fifty-fifth birthday of
the member or on or after the fiftieth birthday of a member who has been in the
employ of the state for twenty-five years, as calculated in section 81-2033,
the percentage shall be three percent multiplied by the number of years of
creditable service, as calculated in section 81-2033, except that the
percentage shall never be greater than seventy-five percent.
(b) For retirement pursuant to subsection (2) of section 81-2025 on or
after the fiftieth birthday of the member but prior to the fifty-fifth birthday
of the member who has been in the employ of the state for less than twenty-five
years, as calculated in section 81-2033, the annuity which would apply if the
member were age fifty-five at the date of retirement shall be reduced by five-
ninths of one percent for each month by which the early retirement date
precedes age fifty-five or for each month by which the early retirement date
precedes the date upon which the member has served for twenty-five years,
whichever is earlier. Any officer who has completed thirty years of creditable
service with the Nebraska State Patrol shall have retirement benefits computed
as if the officer had reached age fifty-five.
(c) For purposes of this computation:
(i) For an officer who became a member prior to July 1, 2016, final
average monthly compensation means the sum of the officer's total compensation
during the three twelve-month periods of service as an officer in which
compensation was the greatest divided by thirty-six and:
(A) For any officer employed on or before January 4, 1979, the officer's
total compensation includes payments received for unused vacation and sick
leave accumulated during the final three years of service; or
(B) For any officer employed after January 4, 1979, and prior to July 1,
2016, the officer's total compensation includes payments received for unused
-3-

LB645 LB645
2025 2025
holiday compensatory time and unused compensatory time; and
(ii) For an officer who became a member on or after July 1, 2016, final
average monthly compensation means the sum of the officer's total compensation
during the five twelve-month periods of service as an officer in which
compensation was the greatest divided by sixty and does not include payments
received for unused sick leave, unused vacation leave, unused holiday
compensatory time, unused compensatory time, or any other type of unused leave,
compensatory time, or similar benefits, converted to cash payments. The five
twelve-month periods used for calculating an officer's final average monthly
compensation ends with the month during which the officer's final compensation
is paid. In the determination of compensation, that part of an officer's
compensation for the plan year which exceeds the officer's compensation for the
preceding plan year by more than eight percent during the capping period shall
be excluded. Such officer's compensation for the first plan year of the capping
period shall be compared to the officer's compensation received for the plan
year immediately preceding the capping period. For purposes of this
subdivision, capping period means the five plan years preceding the officer's
retirement date. The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for
the implementation of this section, including rules and regulations related to
prorating, annualizing, or recalculating an officer's final average monthly
compensation for each plan year in the capping period.
(2) Any officer qualified for an annuity as provided in section 81-2025
for reasons of disability shall be entitled to receive a monthly annuity for
the remainder of the period of disablement as provided in sections 81-2028 to
81-2030. The amount of the annuity shall be fifty percent of the officer's
monthly compensation at the date of disablement if the officer has completed
seventeen or fewer years of creditable service. If the officer has completed
more than seventeen years of creditable service, the amount of the annuity
shall be three percent of the final monthly compensation at the date of
disablement multiplied by the total years of creditable service but not to
exceed seventy-five percent of the final average monthly compensation as
defined in subsection (1) of this section. The date of disablement shall be the
date on which the benefits as provided in section 81-2028 have been exhausted.
(3) Upon the death of an officer after retirement for reasons other than
disability, benefits shall be provided as a percentage of the amount of the
officer's annuity, calculated as follows:
(a) If there is a surviving spouse but no dependent child or children of
the officer under nineteen years of age, the surviving spouse shall receive a
benefit equal to:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity for the remainder of the surviving spouse's life; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity for the remainder of the surviving spouse's life;
(b) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in his or
her care a dependent child or children of the officer under nineteen years of
age and there is no other dependent child or children of the officer not in the
care of the surviving spouse under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
equal to one hundred percent of the officer's annuity. When there is no
remaining dependent child of the officer under nineteen years of age, the
benefit shall be:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life;
(c) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in his or
her care a dependent child or children of the officer under nineteen years of
age or there is another dependent child or children of the officer under
nineteen years of age not in the care of the surviving spouse, the benefit
shall be twenty-five percent of the amount of the officer's annuity to the
surviving spouse and seventy-five percent of the amount of the officer's
annuity to the dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to
be divided equally among such dependent children but in no case shall the
benefit received by a surviving spouse and dependent children residing with
such spouse be less than fifty percent of the amount of the officer's annuity.
At such time as any dependent child of the officer attains nineteen years of
age, the benefit shall be divided equally among the remaining dependent
children of the officer who have not yet attained nineteen years of age. When
there is no remaining dependent child of the officer under nineteen years of
age, the benefit shall be:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life;
(d) If there is no surviving spouse and a dependent child or children of
the officer under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be equal to:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the officer's annuity
to the dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to be
divided equally among such dependent children. At such time as any dependent
child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
-4-

LB645 LB645
2025 2025
divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the officer who have
not yet attained nineteen years of age; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the officer's annuity
to the dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to be
divided equally among such dependent children. At such time as any dependent
child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the officer who have
not yet attained nineteen years of age; and
(e) If there is no surviving spouse or no dependent child or children of
the officer under nineteen years of age, the amount of benefit such officer has
received under the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act shall be computed. If
such amount is less than the contributions to the State Patrol Retirement Fund
made by such officer, plus regular interest, the difference shall be paid to
the officer's designated beneficiary or estate.
(4) Upon the death of an officer after retirement for reasons of
disability, benefits shall be provided as if the officer had retired for
reasons other than disability.
(5) Upon the death of an officer before retirement, benefits shall be
provided as if the officer had retired for reasons of disability on the date of
such officer's death, calculated as follows:
(a) If there is a surviving spouse but no dependent child or children of
the officer under nineteen years of age, the surviving spouse shall receive a
benefit equal to:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity for the remainder of the surviving spouse's life; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity for the remainder of the surviving spouse's life;
(b) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in his or
her care a dependent child or children of the officer under nineteen years of
age and there is no other dependent child or children of the officer not in the
care of the surviving spouse under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
equal to one hundred percent of the officer's annuity. When there is no
remaining dependent child of the officer under nineteen years of age, the
benefit shall be:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life;
(c) If there is a surviving spouse and the surviving spouse has in his or
her care a dependent child or children of the officer under nineteen years of
age or there is another dependent child or children of the officer under
nineteen years of age not in the care of the surviving spouse, the benefit
shall be twenty-five percent of the amount of the officer's annuity to the
surviving spouse and seventy-five percent of the amount of the officer's
annuity to the dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to
be divided equally among such dependent children but in no case shall the
benefit received by a surviving spouse and dependent children residing with
such spouse be less than fifty percent of the amount of the officer's annuity.
At such time as any dependent child of the officer attains nineteen years of
age, the benefit shall be divided equally among the remaining dependent
children of the officer who have not yet attained nineteen years of age. When
there is no remaining dependent child of the officer under nineteen years of
age, the benefit shall be:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the amount of the
officer's annuity to the surviving spouse for the remainder of the surviving
spouse's life;
(d) If there is no surviving spouse and a dependent child or children of
the officer under nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be equal to:
(i) Prior to July 1, 2027, seventy-five percent of the officer's annuity
to the dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to be
divided equally among such dependent children. At such time as any dependent
child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the officer who have
not yet attained nineteen years of age; and
(ii) Beginning July 1, 2027, one hundred percent of the officer's annuity
to the dependent children of the officer under nineteen years of age to be
divided equally among such dependent children. At such time as any dependent
child of the officer attains nineteen years of age, the benefit shall be
divided equally among the remaining dependent children of the officer who have
not yet attained nineteen years of age; and
(e) If no benefits are paid to a surviving spouse or dependent child or
children of the officer, benefits will be paid as described in subsection (1)
of section 81-2031.
(6) A lump-sum death benefit paid to the member's beneficiary, other than
the member's estate, that is an eligible distribution may be distributed in the
form of a direct transfer to a retirement plan eligible to receive such
transfer under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.
(7) For any member whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2007, while
-5-

LB645 LB645
2025 2025
performing qualified military service as defined in section 414(u) of the
Internal Revenue Code, the member's beneficiary shall be entitled to any
additional death benefit that would have been provided, other than the accrual
of any benefit relating to the period of qualified military service. The
additional death benefit shall be determined as if the member had returned to
employment with the Nebraska State Patrol and such employment had terminated on
the date of the member's death.
(8) Any changes made to this section by Laws 2004, LB 1097, shall apply
only to retirements, disabilities, and deaths occurring on or after July 16,
2004.
Sec. 5. Original sections 79-916, 79-958, 79-966, and 81-2026, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-6-